ja: パズルのテーマ: 航空機; 動物; 建築物; アート; バレエ; 漫画; 子供; クリスマス; サーカス; シティ; コミック; 恐竜; 教育; 妖精; ファンタジー; ファーム; 動物相; フラグ; 植物相; 食べ物・飲み物; 歴史; 休日; ユーモア; 昆虫; 風景; 地図; 映画&テレビ; 音楽; 人物; プロフェッション; 科学; 形状; 船; 宇宙; スポーツ; おもちゃ; 電車; 乗り物; ビデオゲーム; その他
it: Tema del puzzle: Aerei; Animali; Architettura; Arte; Danza classica; Cartoni animati; Bambini; Natale; Circo; Città; Fumetti; Dinosauri; Istruzione; Fate; Fantasy; Fattoria; Fauna; Bandiere; Flora; Cibo e bevande; Storia; Vacanze; Umorismo; Insetti; Paesaggio; Mappe; Film e TV; Musica; Persone; Professioni; Scienza; Forme; Navi; Spazio; Sport; Giocattoli; Treni; Veicoli; Videogiochi; Altro
hr-HR: Tema slagalice: Zrakoplov; Životinje; Arhitektura; Umjetnost; Balet; Crtani filmovi; Djeca; Božić; Cirkus; Grad; Stripovi; Dinosauri; Obrazovanje; Vile; Fantazija; Farma; Fauna; Zastave; Flora; Hrana i piće; Povijest; Praznici; Humor; Insekti; Krajolik; Karte; Filmovi i TV; Glazba; Ljudi; Zanimanja; Znanost; Oblici; Brodovi; Svemir; Sport; Igračke; Vlakovi; Vozila; Videoigre; Ostalo
da: Puslespilstema: Flyvemaskiner; Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst; Ballet; Tegnefilm; Børn; Jul; Cirkus; Storby; Tegneserier; Dinosaurer; Uddannelse; Feer; Fantasy; Gård; Fauna; Flag; Flora; Mad og drikkevarer; Historie; Jul; Humor; Insekter; Landskab; Kort; Film & TV; Musik; Mennesker; Professioner; Videnskab; Former; Skibe; Rummet; Sport; Legetøj; Tog; Køretøjer; Computerspil; Andet
sl-SI: Tema uganke: Letalo; Živali; Arhitektura; Umetnost; Balet; Risanke; Za otroke; Božič; Cirkus; Mesto; Stripi; Dinozavri; Izobraževanje; Vila; Fantazijska; Kmetija; Favna; Zastave; Flora; Hrana in pijača; Zgodovina; Prazniki; Humor; Žuželke; Pokrajina; Zemljevidi; Filmi in TV; Glasba; Ljudje; Poklici; Znanost; Oblike; Ladje; Vesolje; Šport; Igrače; Vlaki; Vozila; Video igre; Drugo
bg-BG: Тема на пъзел: Самолети; Животни; Архитектура; Изкуство; Балет; Карикатури; Деца; Коледни; Цирк; Град; Комикси; Динозаври; Образование; Приказки; Фантазия; Ферма; Фауна; Знамена; Флора; Храни и напитки; История; Празници; Хумор; Насекоми; Пейзаж; Карти; Филми и телевизия; Музика; Хора; Професии; Наука; Форми; Кораби; Космос; Спорт; Играчки; Влакове; Превозни средства; Видеоигри; Други
tr: Bulmaca teması: Hava Taşıtları; Hayvanlar; Mimari; Sanat; Bale; Çizgi filmler; Çocuklar; Noel; Sirk; Şehir; Çizgi romanlar; Dinozorlar; Eğitim; Peri; Fantezi; Çiftlik; Fauna; Bayraklar; Bitki örtüsü; Yiyecek ve içecekler; Tarih; Bayramlar; Mizah; Böcekler; Manzara; Haritalar; Film ve TV; Müzik; İnsanlar; Meslekler; Bilim; Şekiller; Gemiler; Uzay; Spor dalları; Oyuncaklar; Trenler; Taşıtlar; Video oyunlar; Diğer
zh-TW: 益智主題: 飛行器; 動物; 建築; 藝術; 芭蕾舞; 卡通; 兒童; 聖誕節; 馬戲團; 城市; 漫畫; 恐龍; 教育; 小仙子; 奇幻; 農場; 動物群; 旗子; 植物群; 食品和飲料; 記錄; 假期; 幽默; 昆蟲; 景觀; 地圖; 電影與電視節目; 音樂; 人物; 職業; 科學; 形狀; 船; 外太空; 體育; 玩具; 火車; 車輛; 電子遊戲; 其他
zh-CN: 益智主题: 飞机; 动物风格; 建筑; 艺术; 芭蕾舞; 卡通; 儿童; 圣诞节; 马戏团; 城市; 漫画; 恐龙; 教育; 仙子; 幻想; 农场; 动物群; 旗帜; 植物群; 食品和饮料; 历史; 节假日; 幽默; 昆虫; 景观; 地图; 电影和电视; 音乐; 大众; 专业技能; 科学; 形状; 舰船; 空间; 体育; 玩具; 火车; 交通工具; 电子游戏风格; 其他
en: Puzzle theme: Aircraft; Animals; Architecture; Art; Ballet; Cartoons; Children; Christmas; Circus; City; Comics; Dinosaurs; Education; Fairy; Fantasy; Farm; Fauna; Flags; Flora; Food & drinks; History; Holidays; Humor; Insects; Landscape; Maps; Movies & TV; Music; People; Professions; Science; Shapes; Ships; Space; Sports; Toys; Trains; Vehicles; Video games; Other
lt-LT: Dėlionės tema: Lėktuvai; Gyvūnai; Architektūra; Menas; Baletas; Animaciniai filmukai; Vaikai; Kalėdos; Cirkas; Miestas; Komiksai; Dinozaurai; Švietimas; Fėjos; Fantastika; Ūkis; Fauna; Vėliavos; Flora; Maistas ir gėrimai; Istorija; Šventės; Humoras; Vabzdžiai; Peizažas; Žemėlapiai; Filmai ir serialai; Muzika; Žmonės; Profesijos; Mokslas; Formos; Laivai; Erdvė; Sportas; Žaislai; Traukiniai; Transporto priemonės; Vaizdo žaidimai; Kita
el: Θέμα παζλ: Αεροπλάνο; Ζώα; Αρχιτεκτονική; Τέχνη; Μπαλέτο; Κινούμενα σχέδια; Παιδιά; Χριστούγεννα; Τσίρκο; Πόλη; Κόμικς; Δεινόσαυροι; Εκπαίδευση; Νεράιδα; Φαντασία; Αγρόκτημα; Πανίδα; Σημαίες; Χλωρίδα; Φαγητό και ποτά; Ιστορία; Διακοπές; Χιουμοριστική; Έντομα; Τοπίο; Χάρτες; Ταινίες και τηλεόραση; Μουσική; Άνθρωποι; Επαγγέλματα; Επιστήμη; Σχήματα; Πλοία; Διάστημα; Αθλητισμός; Παιχνίδια; Τρένα; Οχήματα; Βιντεοπαιχνίδια; Άλλο
vi: Chủ đề câu đố: Máy bay; Động vật; Kiến trúc; Nghệ thuật; Ba lê; Phim hoạt hình; Trẻ em; Giáng sinh; Xiếc; Thành phố; Truyện tranh; Khủng long; Giáo dục; Thần tiên; Kỳ ảo; Nông trại; Hệ động vật; Cờ; Hệ thực vật; Đồ ăn và đồ uống; Lịch sử; Ngày lễ; Hài hước; Côn trùng; Phong cảnh; Bản đồ; Phim & Truyền hình; Âm nhạc; Mọi người; Nghề nghiệp chuyên môn; Khoa học; Hình dạng; Tàu thuyền; Không gian; Thể thao; Đồ chơi; Xe lửa; Xe cộ; Trò chơi điện tử; Khác
nb: Puslespilltema: Fly; Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst; Ballett; Tegneserier; Barn; Jul; Sirkus; By; Tegneserier; Dinosaurer; Utdanning; Fe; Fantasi; Gård; Fauna; Flagg; Flora; Mat og drikke; Historie; Helligdager; Humor; Insekter; Landskap; Kart; Filmer og TV; Musikk; Mennesker; Yrker; Vitenskap; Former; Skip; Verdensrom; Sport; Leker; Tog; Kjøretøy; Videospill; Annen
th: ธีมปริศนา: เครื่องบิน; สัตว์ต่างๆ; สถาปัตยกรรม; ศิลปะ; บัลเลต์; การ์ตูนต่างๆ; เด็กๆ; คริสต์มาส; ละครสัตว์; เมือง; คอมมิก; ไดโนเสาร์; การศึกษา; แฟรี่; แฟนตาซี; ฟาร์ม; สัตว์ประจำถิ่น; ธง; พืชดอก; อาหารกับเครื่องดื่ม; ประวัติศาสตร์; ช่วงวันหยุด; อารมณ์ขัน; แมลง; ภูมิประเทศ; แผนที่; ภาพยนตร์และทีวี; ดนตรี; ผู้คน; โปรเฟสชัน; วิทศาสตร์; รูปร่าง; เรือขนาดใหญ่; อวกาศ; กีฬาต่างๆ; ของเล่น; รถไฟ; ยานพาหนะ; วิดีโอเกมต่างๆ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tema de puzzle: Aeronave; Animais; Arquitetura; Arte; Balé; Desenhos animados; Crianças; Natal; Circo; Cidade; Banda desenhada; Dinossauros; Educação; Fada; Fantasia; Quinta; Fauna; Bandeiras; Flora; Bens alimentares e bebidas; História; Festividades; Humor; Insetos; Paisagem; Mapas; Filmes e TV; Música; Pessoas; Profissões; Ciência; Formas; Navios; Espaço; Desportivo; Brinquedos; Comboios; Veículos; Videojogos; Outro
de: Thema des Puzzles: Luftfahrzeuge; Tiere; Architektur; Kunst; Ballett; Cartoons; Kinder; Weihnachten; Zirkus; Stadt; Comics; Dinosaurier; Bildung; Fee; Fantasy; Bauernhof; Fauna; Flaggen; Flora; Essen und Trinken; Geschichte; Feiertage; Humor; Insekten; Landschaft; Karten; Filme und Fernsehen; Musik; Menschen; Berufe; Wissenschaft; Formen; Schiffe; Weltraum; Sportarten; Spielzeuge; Züge; Fahrzeuge; Videospiele; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Temă puzzle: Avioane; Animale; Arhitectură; Artă; Balet; Desene animate; Copii; Crăciun; Circ; Urban; Benzi desenate; Dinozauri; Educație; Zâne; Fantezie; Fermă; Faună; Steaguri; Floră; Alimente și băuturi; Istorie; Sărbători; Umor; Insecte; Peisaj; Hărți; Filme și televiziune; Muzică; Oameni; Profesii; Știință; Forme; Ambarcațiuni; Spațiu; Sport; Jucării; Trenuri; Vehicule; Jocuri video; Altele
ru: Тема головоломки: Летательные аппараты; Животные; Архитектура; Искусство; Балет; Мультфильмы; Дети; Рождество; Цирк; Город; Комиксы; Динозавры; Образование; Сказки; Фантастика; Ферма; Фауна; Флаги; Флора; Еда и напитки; История; Праздники; Юмор; Насекомые; Пейзаж; Карты; Фильмы и ТВ; Музыка; Люди; Профессии; Наука; Формы; Корабли; Космос; Спорт; Игрушки; Поезда; Транспортные средства; Видеоигры; Другой
fi: Palapelin teema: Ilma-alukset; Eläimet; Arkkitehtuuri; Taide; Baletti; Sarjakuvat; Lapset; Joulu; Sirkus; Kaupunki; Sarjakuvat; Dinosaurukset; Koulutus; Keiju; Fantasia; Maatila; Eläimistö; Liput; Kasvisto; Ruoka ja juomat; Historia; Lomailu; Huumori; Hyönteiset; Maisema; Kartat; Elokuvat ja TV; Musiikki; Ihmiset; Ammatit; Tiede; Muodot; Alukset; Avaruus; Urheilu; Lelut; Junat; Ajoneuvot; Videopelit; Muu
pl: Temat puzzle: Samolot; Zwierzęta; Architektura; Sztuka; Balet; Kreskówka; Dzieci; Boże Narodzenie; Cyrk; Miejscowość; Komiksy; Dinozaury; Edukacja; Wróżka; Fantasy; Farma; Fauna; Flagi; Flora; Jedzenie i napoje; Historia; Wakacje; Humor; Owady; Krajobraz; Mapy; Filmy i telewizja; Muzyczne; Ludzie; Zawody; Nauki ścisłe; Kształty; Statki; Powierzchnia; Sport; Zabawki; Pociągi; Pojazdy; Gry wideo; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Tema de quebra-cabeça: Aeronave; Animais; Arquitetura; Arte; Balé; Desenhos animados; Infantil; Natal; Circo; Cidade; Histórias em quadrinhos; Dinossauros; Educação; Fada; Fantasia; Fazenda; Fauna; Bandeiras; Flora; Comidas e bebidas; História; Feriados; Humor; Insetos; Paisagem; Mapas; Filmes e TV; Música; Pessoas; Profissões; Ciência; Formas; Navios; Espaço; Esportes; Brinquedos; Trens; Veículos; Videogames; Outro
es: Tema de rompecabezas: Avión; Animales; Arquitectura; Arte; Ballet; Dibujos animados; Niños; Navidad; Circo; Ciudad; Cómics; Dinosaurios; Educación; Hada; Fantasía; Granja; Fauna; Banderas; Flora; Comida y bebidas; Historia; Vacaciones; Humor; Insectos; Paisaje; Mapas; Películas y televisión; Música; Gente; Profesiones; Ciencia; Formas; Barcos; Espacio; Deportes; Juguetes; Trenes; Vehículos; Videojuegos; Otros
hu: Kirakós játék témája: Repülőgép; Állatok; Építészet; Művészet; Balett; Rajzfilmek; Gyermekek; Karácsony; Cirkusz; Város; Képregények; Dinoszauruszok; Oktatás; Tündér; Fantasy; Farm; Állatvilág; Zászlók; Növényvilág; Ételek és italok; Történelem; Ünnepek; Humor; Bogarak; Tájkép; Térképek; Filmek és TV; Zene; Emberek; Szakmák; Tudomány; Alakzatok; Hajók; Űr; Sport; Játékok; Vonatok; Járművek; Videojátékok; Egyéb
sv: Pusseltema: Flygplan; Djur; Arkitektur; Konst; Balett; Tecknade serier; Barn; Jul; Cirkus; Stad; Serier; Dinosaurier; Utbildning; Fé; Fantasy; Lantgård; Fauna; Flaggor; Flora; Mat & drycker; Historia; Högtider; Humor; Insekter; Landskap; Kartor; Filmer och TV; Musik; Människor; Yrken; Vetenskap; Former; Fartyg; Rymden; Sporter; Leksaker; Tåg; Fordon; Videospel; Annat
sk-SK: Motív puzzle: Lietadlo; Zvieratá; Architektúra; Umenie; Balet; Animované rozprávky; Deti; Vianočný; Cirkus; Mesto; Komiksy; Dinosaury; Vzdelávanie; Víla; Fantastika; Farma; Fauna; Vlajky; Flora; Jedlo a nápoje; História; Prázdniny; Humor; Hmyz; Krajina; Mapy; Filmy a televízia; Hudba; Ľudia; Profesie; Veda; Tvary; Lode; Vesmír; Šport; Hračky; Vlaky; Vozidlá; Videohry; Iné
nl: Puzzelthema: Vliegtuig; Dieren; Architectuur; Kunst; Ballet; Tekenfilms; Kinderen; Kerst; Circus; Stad; Strips; Dinosaurussen; Onderwijs; Fee; Droomwereld; Boerderij; Fauna; Vlaggen; Flora; Eten en drinken; Geschiedenis; Feestdagen; Humor; Insecten; Landschap; Kaarten; Films en tv; Muziek; Mensen; Beroepen; Wetenschap; Vormen; Schepen; Ruimte; Sporten; Speelgoed; Treinen; Voertuigen; Computerspellen; Andere
ko: 퍼즐 테마: 비행기; 동물; 건축; 미술; 발레; 카툰; 어린이; 크리스마스; 서커스; 도시; 만화; 공룡; 교육; 요정; 판타지; 농장; 동물군; 응원기; 식물군; 음식 & 음료; 역사; 연휴; 유머; 곤충; 풍경; 지도; 영화 & TV; 음악; 사람들; 전문직; 과학; 모양; 선박; 우주; 스포츠; 장난감; 열차; 차량; 비디오 게임; 기타
fr: Thème du puzzle: Avion; Animaux; Architecture; Art; Ballet; Dessins animés; Enfants; Noël; Cirque; Ville; Bandes dessinées; Dinosaures; Éducation; Féerique; Fantaisie; Ferme; Faune; Drapeaux; Flore; Alimentation et boissons; Histoire; Vacances; Humour; Insectes; Paysage; Cartes; Films et télévision; Musique; Personnes; Professions; Sciences; Formes; Navires; Espace; Sports; Jouets; Trains; Véhicules; Jeux vidéo; Autre
cs: Téma puzzle: Letadla; Zvířata; Architektura; Umění; Balet; Komiksy; Děti; Vánoce; Cirkus; Město; Komiks; Dinosauři; Vzdělání; Víly; Fantazie; Farma; Fauna; Vlajky; Flóra; Jídlo a pití; Historie; Svátky; Humor; Hmyz; Krajina; Mapy; Filmy a TV; Hudba; Lidé; Povolání; Věda; Tvary; Lodě; Vesmír; Sporty; Hračky; Vlaky; Dopravní prostředky; Videohry; Jiné